Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB41.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 132.017 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Local governmental entity" includes a county fiscal court and legislative
body of a city, urban-county government, consolidated local government,
charter county government, unified local government, or other taxing district;[
and]
(b) "Next regular election" means the regular election that occurs immediately
after all statutory requirements for levying a property tax rate have been met,
regardless of whether the election occurs in the same or a subsequent calendar
year as the levy of the property tax rate; and
(c) "School nickel tax rate" means a five cents ($0.05) equivalent tax rate that
is:
1. Subject to recall at the time it is levied; and
2. Levied by a local board of education for the purpose of supporting
debt service, new facilities, or major renovation of existing facilities.
(2) (a) 1. Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph,[ the portion of]
a school nickel tax rate levied by a local[an ordinance, order, resolution,
or motion of a local governmental entity or district] board of education[
subject to recall as provided for in KRS 68.245, 132.023, 132.027, and
160.470,] shall go into effect forty-five (45) days after its passage.
2. When a school nickel tax rate is levied by a local[district] board of
education[ or other taxing district] that is primarily located in a county
containing an urban-county government or a consolidated local
government, the[ portion of a] school nickel tax rate[ levied by an
ordinance, order, resolution, or motion of a district board of education or
Page 1 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
other taxing district subject to recall as provided for in KRS 68.245,
132.023, 132.027, and 160.470,] shall go into effect fifty (50) days after
its passage.
(b) During the same forty-five (45) day or fifty (50) day time period provided by
paragraph (a) of this subsection, any three (3) qualified voters, who reside in
the area where the school nickel tax rate levy will be imposed, may
commence petition proceedings to protest the passage of the[ ordinance,]
order, resolution, or motion of the local board of education by filing an
affidavit with the county clerk. The affidavit shall state:
1. The three (3) qualified voters constitute the members of the petition
committee;
2. The petition committee will be responsible for circulating the petition;
3. The petition committee will file the petition in the proper form within
the same forty-five (45) day or fifty (50) day time period provided by
paragraph (a) of this subsection;
4. The names and addresses of the petition committee members;
5. The address to which all notices to the committee are to be sent; and
6. For petition committees filing petitions in response to a school nickel
tax rate levied by a local[district] board of education[ or other taxing
district] that is primarily located in a county containing an urban-county
government or a consolidated local government, whether or not the
petition committee is willing to incur all of the expenses associated with
electronic petition signatures. If the petition committee is not willing to
incur all of the expenses, then electronic petition signatures shall not be
allowed for the petition.
(c) Upon receipt of the affidavit, the county clerk shall immediately:
1. Notify the petition committee of all statutory requirements for the filing
Page 2 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
of a valid petition under this section;
2. Notify the petition committee that the clerk will publish a notice
identifying the school nickel tax rate levy being challenged and
providing the names and addresses of the petition committee in a
newspaper of general circulation within the county, if:
a. There is a newspaper within the county in which to publish the
notice; and
b. The petition committee remits an amount equal to the cost of
publishing the notice determined in accordance with the provisions
of KRS 424.160 at the time of the filing of the affidavit.
If the petition committee elects to have the notice published, the clerk
shall publish the notice within five (5) days of receipt of the affidavit;
and
3. Deliver a copy of the affidavit to the local[appropriate local
governmental entity or district] board of education.
(d) The petition shall meet the following requirements:
1. All papers of the petition shall be substantially uniform in size and style
and shall be assembled in one (1) instrument for filing;
2. Each sheet of the petition may contain the names of voters from more
than one (1) voting precinct;
3. Each nonelectronic petition signature shall be executed in ink or
indelible pencil;
4. Each electronic petition signature shall comply with the requirements of
the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, KRS 369.101 to 369.120;
5. Each petition signature shall be followed by the printed name, street
address, birth month, and birth year of the person signing; and
6. a. [i. Except for petitions filed in response to a tax rate levied by a
Page 3 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
district board of education, the petition shall be signed by a
number of registered and qualified voters residing in the
affected jurisdiction equal to at least ten percent (10%) of the
total number of votes cast in the last preceding presidential
election.
ii. For petitions filed in response to a tax rate levied by a district
board of education, ]The petition shall be signed by at least
five thousand (5,000) registered and qualified voters residing
in the affected jurisdiction or signed by a number of
registered and qualified voters residing in the affected
jurisdiction equal to at least ten percent (10%) of the total
number of votes cast in the last preceding presidential
election, whichever is less.
b. Electronic petition signatures shall be included in determining
whether the required number of petition signatures has been
obtained when:
i. The expenses associated with the electronic petition
signatures have been incurred in accordance with paragraph
(b)6. of this subsection;
ii. The electronic petition signatures comply with the
requirements of this subsection; and
iii. The petition was filed in response to a school nickel tax rate
levied by a local[district] board of education[ or other taxing
district] that is primarily located in a county containing an
urban-county government or a consolidated local
government.
c. The inclusion of an invalid petition signature on a page shall not
Page 4 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
invalidate the entire page of the petition, but shall instead result in
the invalid petition signature being stricken and not counted.
(e) Upon the filing of the petition with the county clerk, the[ ordinance,] order,
resolution, or motion of the local board of education shall be suspended from
going into effect until after the election referred to in subsection (4)[(3)] of
this section is held, or until the petition is finally determined to be insufficient
and[ no] further action may not be taken pursuant to paragraph (i) of this
subsection.
(f) The county clerk shall immediately notify the presiding officer of the local[
appropriate local governmental entity or district] board of education that the
petition has been received and shall, within thirty (30) days of the receipt of
the petition, make a determination of whether the petition contains enough
signatures of qualified voters to place the[ ordinance,] order, resolution, or
motion of the local board of education before the voters.
(g) If the county clerk finds the petition to be sufficient, the clerk shall certify to
the petition committee and the local[ governmental entity or district] board of
education within the thirty (30) day period provided for in paragraph (f) of
this subsection that the petition is properly presented and in compliance with
the provisions of this section, and that the[ ordinance], order, resolution, or
motion of the local board of education levying the school nickel tax rate will
be placed before the voters for approval.
(h) If the county clerk finds the petition to be insufficient, the clerk shall, within
the thirty (30) day period provided for in paragraph (f) of this subsection,
notify, in writing, the petition committee and the local[local governmental
entity or district] board of education of the specific deficiencies found.
Notification shall be sent by certified mail and shall be published at least one
(1) time in a newspaper of general circulation within the county containing the
Page 5 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
local[ governmental entity or district] board of education levying the school
nickel tax rate. If there is not a newspaper within the county in which to
publish the notification, then the notification shall be posted at the courthouse
door.
(i) A final determination of the sufficiency of a petition shall be subject to final
review by the Circuit Court of the county in which the local[ governmental
entity or district] board of education is located, and shall be limited to the
validity of the county clerk's determination. Any petition challenging the
county clerk's final determination shall be filed within ten (10) days of the
issuance of the clerk's final determination.
(j) The local[ governmental entity or district] board of education may cause the
cancellation of the election by reconsidering and amending its[the ordinance,]
order, resolution, or motion to levy a school nickel tax rate[ which will
produce no more revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from new
property as defined in KRS 132.010, than four percent (4%) over the amount
of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010
from real property]. The action by the local[ governmental entity or district]
board of education shall be valid only if taken within fifteen (15) days
following the date the clerk finds the petition to be sufficient.
(3) (a) This subsection applies to:
1. An ad valorem tax rate, other than a school nickel tax rate, that is
levied by a local governmental entity and subject to recall under
Section 2, 5, or 6 of this Act; and
2. A general ad valorem tax rate levied by a local board of education and
subject to recall under Section 7 of this Act.
(b) The levy of an ad valorem tax rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of revenue from new property, more than four percent
Page 6 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
(4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate,
shall be subject to recall by placing a question on a ballot before the voters
of the taxing district.
(c) The ordinance, order, resolution, or motion of the local governmental entity
or local board of education levying the tax rate shall be suspended from
going into effect until after an election is held. The taxing district may
cause the cancellation of the election by reconsidering and amending its
ordinance, order, resolution, or motion to levy the compensating tax rate.
(4) (a) If an election is necessary under[ the provisions of] subsection (2) of this
section,[:
1. The local governmental entity shall cause to be submitted to the voters
of the district at the next regular election, the question as to whether the
property tax rate shall be levied; or
2. ] the local[district] board of education shall cause to be submitted to the
voters of the district in a called[ common school] election not less than
thirty-five (35) days nor more than forty-five (45) days from the date the
signatures on the petition are validated by the county clerk, or at the next
regular election, at the option of the local[district] board of education,
the question as to whether the school nickel[property] tax rate shall be
levied.
(b) 1. If an election is necessary under subsection (3) of this section, a local
governmental entity or local board of education shall cause to be
submitted to the voters of the taxing district in either a called election
or at the next regular election, the question as to whether the tax rate
shall be levied.
2. If the question is submitted to the voters in a called election:
a. At least thirty (30) days prior to the election, the taxing district
Page 7 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
shall inform the voters of the district about the details of the
election through posting information on the first page of the
taxing district's website for a period of two (2) weeks, and:
i. Publishing the information through the largest newspaper
in the county, whether viewable to the public through an
online subscription or by paper distribution, for a period of
two (2) weeks; or
ii. Sending a single notice containing the information by first-
class mail to each person owning real property in the
taxing district, addressed to the property owner at his or her
residence or principal place of business as shown on the
current year property tax roll; and
b. For a local governmental entity subject to KRS 65A.110, the
election shall be held after the approval of the tax rate by the
establishing entity or the expiration of the thirty (30) day failure
to act deadline.
(c) If an election is necessary under either subsection (2) or (3) of this section:
1. The cost of a called[ common school] election shall be borne by the
taxing[school] district holding the election;
2. [. ]Any called[ common school] election shall comply with the
provisions of KRS 118.025; and[.]
3.[(b)] If an election[ under paragraph (a) of this subsection] is held in
conjunction with a regular election, the question as to whether the[
property] tax rate shall be levied shall be submitted to the county clerk
no later than the second Tuesday in August preceding the regular
election.
(5) (a)[(c)] In an election held under subsection (4) of this section[paragraph (a) of
Page 8 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
this subsection], the question shall be framed to ask whether the voter is for
the levy of the[ property] tax rate. If a majority of the votes cast upon the
question oppose its passage, the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion of the
local governmental entity or local board of education shall not go into effect.
If a majority of the votes cast upon the question favor its passage, the
ordinance, order, resolution, or motion of the local governmental entity or
local board of education shall become effective.
(b)[(d)] If the ordinance, order, resolution, or motion of the local governmental
entity or local board of education fails to pass in[pursuant to] an election
held under subsection (4)(b) of this section,[paragraph (a) of this subsection,
the property tax rate which will produce four percent (4%) more revenues
from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property[ as defined in
KRS 132.010], than the amount of revenue produced by] the compensating
tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010,] shall be levied without further approval by
the local governmental entity or local[district] board of education.
(6)[(e)] Local, state, and federal tax dollars shall not be used to advocate, in partial
terms, for or against any public question that appears on a[the] ballot under[in] this
section[subsection]. As used in[For purposes of] this subsection[section], "local"
means and includes any city, county, urban-county government, consolidated local
government, unified local government, charter county, or special district.
(7)[(4)] Notwithstanding any statutory provision to the contrary, if a local
governmental entity or local[district] board of education has not established a final
tax rate as of September 15, due to the recall provisions of this section, KRS
68.245, 132.027, or 160.470, regular tax bills shall be prepared as required in KRS
133.220 for all taxing districts having a tax rate established by that date; and a
second set of bills shall be prepared and collected in the regular manner, according
to the provisions of KRS Chapter 132, upon establishment of final tax rates by the
Page 9 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
remaining taxing districts.
(8)[(5)] If a second billing is necessary, the collection period shall be extended to
conform with the second billing date.[
(6) ] All costs associated with the second billing shall be paid by the taxing district[ or
districts] requiring the second billing.
Section 2. KRS 68.245 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The property valuation administrator shall submit an official estimate of real and
personal property and new property assessment as defined in KRS 132.010, to the
county judge/executive by April 1 of each year.
(2) A[No] county fiscal court shall not levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate
which may be levied at the request of a county community improvement district
pursuant to KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon the[such]
tax by the voters of that county, which exceeds the compensating tax rate defined in
KRS 132.010, until the taxing district has complied with the provisions of
subsection (5) of this section.
(3) The state local finance officer shall certify to each county judge/executive, by June
30 of each year, the following:
(a) The compensating tax rate, as defined in KRS 132.010, and the amount of
revenue expected to be produced by it;
(b) The tax rate which will produce no more revenue from real property,
exclusive of revenue from new property, than four percent (4%) over the
amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate as defined in KRS
132.010 and the amount of revenue expected to be produced by it.
(4) Real and personal property assessment and new property determined in accordance
with KRS 132.010 shall be certified to the state local finance officer by the
Department of Revenue upon completion of action on property assessment data.
(5) (a) A county fiscal court, proposing to levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax
Page 10 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
rate which may be levied at the request of a county community improvement
district pursuant to KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote
upon the tax by the voters of that county, which exceeds the compensating tax
rate as defined in KRS 132.010, shall hold a public hearing to hear comments
from the public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearing shall be held in
the principal office of the taxing district, or, in the event the taxing district
does not have an[has no] office[,] or the office is not suitable for a hearing,
the hearing shall be held in a suitable facility as near as possible to the
geographic center of the district.
(b) County fiscal courts of counties containing a city of the first class proposing
to levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which may be levied at the
request of a county community improvement district pursuant to KRS
107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon the tax by the voters of
that county, which exceeds the compensating tax rate as defined in KRS
132.010, shall hold three (3) public hearings to hear comments from the
public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearings shall be held in three (3)
separate locations; each location shall be determined by dividing the county
into three (3) approximately equal geographic areas, and identifying a suitable
facility as near as possible to the geographic center of each area.
(c) The county fiscal court shall advertise the hearing by causing to be published
at least twice in two (2) consecutive weeks, in the newspaper of largest
circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of not less than twelve
(12) column inches, the following:
1. The tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by
that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current year and the revenue expected to
be produced by that rate;
Page 11 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
3. The compensating tax rate and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearings which shall be held not less
than seven (7) days nor more than ten (10) days, after the day that the
second advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained therein.
(d) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property, addressed to the property owner at his or her residence or principal
place of business as shown on the current year property tax roll.
(e) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The county fiscal court may
set reasonable time limits for testimony.
(6) (a) [That portion of ]A tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which may be
levied at the request of a county community improvement district pursuant to
KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon a tax by the
voters of that county, levied by an action of a county fiscal court which will
produce revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property,
more than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010 shall be subject to a recall
vote or reconsideration by the taxing district, as provided for in KRS 132.017,
and shall be advertised as provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The county fiscal court shall, within seven (7) days following the adoption of
Page 12 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
its[an] ordinance to levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which may
be levied at the request of a county community improvement district pursuant
to KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon a tax by the
voters of that county, which will produce revenue from real property,
exclusive of revenue from new property as defined in KRS 132.010, more
than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010, cause to be published, in
the newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type
advertisement of not less than twelve (12) column inches the following:
1. The fact that the county fiscal court has adopted a rate; and
2. The fact that[ the part of] the rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property as defined in KRS 132.010, in
excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 is subject to recall[; and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk, with a
notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate].
Section 3. KRS 75A.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon the creation of a district, the trustees of a district are authorized to
provide fire services, emergency medical services subject to KRS Chapter
311A, or rescue services pursuant to KRS Chapter 39F, as provided in
paragraph (c) of this subsection, and to levy a tax upon the property in the
district.
(b) The property taxed shall be subject to county tax, and the tax levied by the
board upon creation of the district shall be approved by the county fiscal
court, consolidated local government, charter county government, or unified
local government having jurisdiction over the district at the time of passage of
Page 13 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
the ordinance creating the district. The tax shall not exceed ten cents ($0.10)
per one hundred dollars ($100) of valuation as assessed for county taxes, for
the purpose of defraying the expenses for the provision of fire services or
rescue services. The rate set in this subsection shall apply, notwithstanding the
provisions of KRS 132.023.
(c) The district that establishes and operates an emergency ambulance service and
is the primary service provider in the district may levy a tax upon the property
in the district. The tax to be levied shall be proposed by the board, shall be
approved by the county fiscal court, consolidated local government, charter
county government, or unified local government having jurisdiction over the
district and the tax shall not exceed twenty cents ($0.20) per one hundred
dollars ($100) of valuation as assessed for county taxes, for the purpose of
defraying the expenses of the provision of fire services, emergency medical
services, or rescue service, or to make contracts for fire protection for the
districts as provided in KRS 75.050. The rate set in this subsection shall
apply, notwithstanding KRS 132.023.
(d) 1. Any increase of the total tax levy beyond the rate initially approved by
the board and authorized by the county fiscal court, consolidated local
government, charter county government, or unified local government
shall be subject to KRS 132.023. Any increase in excess of the annual
compensating rate for the consolidated emergency services district shall
require the approval of the county fiscal court, consolidated local
government, charter county government, or unified local government
having jurisdiction over the district. If at any time an election[ resulting
from a recall petition] pursuant to KRS 132.017 is required, the question
shall be presented to all voters in every precinct for which any part of
the precinct is served by the district[ subject to the recall petition].
Page 14 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
2. If two (2) or more established consolidated emergency services merge to
create a new consolidated emergency services district, as authorized in
this chapter, the initial tax to be levied, as proposed by the board, shall
be approved by the county fiscal court, consolidated local government,
charter county government, or unified local government having
jurisdiction over the district, and the initial tax levied shall not exceed
the highest tax rate currently levied by one (1) of the merging districts.
Any increase to the initial tax rate shall be subject to KRS 132.023. Any
increase in excess of the annual compensating rate for the consolidated
emergency services district shall require the approval of the county
fiscal court, consolidated local government, charter county government,
or unified local government having jurisdiction over the district. If at
any time an election[ resulting from a recall petition] pursuant to KRS
132.017 is required, the question shall be presented to all voters in every
precinct for which any part of the district serves.
(2) The property valuation administrator of the county in which the district is created,
with the cooperation of the board, shall note on the tax rolls the taxpayers and
valuation of the property subject to an[such] assessment. The county clerk shall
compute the tax on the regular state and county tax bills in a[such] manner as may
be directed by regulation of the Department of Revenue.
(3) These taxes shall be subject to the same delinquency date, discounts, penalties, and
interest as are applied to the collection of ad valorem taxes and shall be collected by
the sheriff of the county involved and accounted for to the treasurer of the district.
The sheriff shall be entitled to a fee of the amount collected by him or her. The
fiscal court shall, in the ordinance set forth in subsection (2) of this section and in
consultation with the sheriff and the consolidated emergency services district, set a
collection fee for the sheriff in an amount not to exceed four and one-fourth percent
Page 15 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
(4.25%).
Section 4. KRS 132.018 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the tax rate applicable to real property levied by a county fiscal court,
local[district] board of education, or legislative body of a city, consolidated local
government, urban-county government, or other taxing district is reduced as a result
of reconsideration by the county fiscal court, local[district] board of education, or
legislative body of a city, consolidated local government, urban-county
government, or other taxing district under[ the provisions of] KRS 132.017[(2)(j)],
the tax rate applicable to personal property levied under[ the provisions of] KRS
68.248(1), 132.024(1), 132.029(1), and 160.473(1) shall be reduced by the
respective county fiscal court, local[district] board of education, or legislative body
of a city, consolidated local government, urban-county government, or other taxing
district to an amount which will produce the same percentage increase in revenue
from personal property as the percentage increase in revenue from real property
resulting from the reduced tax rate applicable to real property.
(2) If the tax rate applicable to real property levied by a county fiscal court,
local[district] board of education, or legislative body of a city, consolidated local
government, urban-county government, or other taxing district is reduced[,] under[
the provisions of] KRS 132.017[(3)], as a result of a majority of votes cast in an
election being opposed to the[such a] rate, the tax rate applicable to personal
property levied by the respective county fiscal court, local[district] board of
education, or legislative body of a city, consolidated local government, urban-
county government, or other taxing district shall be reduced, without further action
by the levying body, to an amount which will produce the same percentage increase
in revenue from personal property as the percentage increase in revenue from real
property resulting from the reduced tax rate applicable to real property.
Section 5. KRS 132.023 is amended to read as follows:
Page 16 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
(1) A[No] special purpose governmental entity shall not levy a tax rate which exceeds
the compensating tax rate until the taxing district has complied with the provisions
of KRS 65A.110 and subsection (2) of this section.
(2) (a) A special purpose governmental entity proposing to levy a tax rate which
exceeds the compensating tax rate shall submit the proposed rate as required
by KRS 65A.110 and shall hold a public hearing to hear comments from the
public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearing shall be held in the same
location where the governing body of the city or county where the largest
number of citizens served by the special purpose governmental entity reside
meets, and shall be held immediately before a regularly scheduled meeting of
that governing body.
(b) The special purpose governmental entity shall advertise the hearing by
causing to be published at least twice in two (2) consecutive weeks, in the
newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of
not less than twelve (12) column inches, the following:
1. The tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by
that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current year and the revenue expected to
be produced by that rate;
3. The compensating tax rate and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days, nor more than ten (10) days, after the day that the second
advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
Page 17 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained therein.
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property in the special purpose governmental entity, addressed to the property
owner at his or her residence or principal place of business as shown on the
current year property tax roll.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The special purpose
governmental entity may set reasonable time limits for testimony.
(3) (a) [That portion of ]A tax rate levied by an action of a special purpose
governmental entity which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive
of revenue from new property, more than four percent (4%) over the amount
of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate shall be subject to a recall
vote or reconsideration by the special purpose governmental entity, as
provided for in KRS 132.017, and shall be advertised as provided in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The special purpose governmental entity shall, within seven (7) days
following the adoption of its[an] ordinance, order, resolution, or motion to
levy a tax rate which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive of
revenue from new property, more than four percent (4%) over the amount of
revenue produced by the compensating tax rate, cause to be published, in the
newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of
not less than twelve (12) column inches the following:
1. The fact that the taxing district has adopted a rate; and
2. The fact that[ the part of] the rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property, in excess of four percent (4%) over
Page 18 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate is subject
to recall[; and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the
county in which the special purpose governmental entity is located, with
a notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate].
Section 6. KRS 132.027 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] city or urban-county government shall not levy a tax rate which exceeds the
compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010] until the city or urban-county
government has complied with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.
(2) (a) Cities or urban-county governments proposing to levy a tax rate which
exceeds the compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010] shall hold a
public hearing to hear comments from the public regarding the proposed tax
rate. The hearing shall be held in the principal office of the taxing district, or,
in the event the taxing district does not have an[has no] office[,] or the office
is not suitable for a hearing, the hearing shall be held in a suitable facility as
near as possible to the geographic center of the district.
(b) The city or urban-county government shall advertise the hearing by causing to
be published at least twice in two (2) consecutive weeks, in the newspaper of
largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of not less than
twelve (12) column inches, the following:
1. The tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by
that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current year and the revenue expected to
be produced by that rate;
3. The compensating tax rate and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
Page 19 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days nor more than ten (10) days after the day the second
advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained therein.
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property in the taxing district, addressed to the property owner at his or her
residence or principal place of business as shown on the current year property
tax roll.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The taxing district may set
reasonable time limits for testimony.
(3) (a) [That portion of ]A tax rate levied by an action of a city or urban-county
government which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive of
revenue from new property, more than four percent (4%) over the amount of
revenue produced by the compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010]
shall be subject to a recall vote or reconsideration by the taxing district, as
provided for in KRS 132.017, and shall be advertised as provided for in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The city or urban-county government shall, within seven (7) days following
the adoption of its[an] ordinance to levy a tax rate which will produce revenue
from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property[ as defined in
KRS 132.010], more than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue
Page 20 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
produced by the compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010], cause to be
published, in the newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type
advertisement of not less than twelve (12) column inches the following:
1. The fact that the city or urban-county government has adopted a rate;
and
2. The fact that[ the part of] the rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property[ as defined in KRS 132.010], in
excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate[ defined in KRS 132.010] is subject to recall[,
and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the
county or urban-county in which the taxing district is located, with a
notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate].
Section 7. KRS 160.470 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, a local[no district]
board of education shall not levy a general tax rate which will produce more
revenue, exclusive of revenue from net assessment growth as defined in KRS
132.010, than would be produced by application of the general tax rate that
could have been levied in the preceding year to the preceding year's
assessment, except as provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this section and
KRS 157.440.
(b) If an election is held as provided for in KRS 132.017 and the question should
fail, the[such] failure shall not reduce the "...general tax rate that could have
been levied in the preceding year...," referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this
section, for purposes of computing the general tax rate for succeeding years.
In the event of a merger of school districts, the limitations contained in this section
Page 21 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
shall be based upon the combined revenue of the merging districts, as computed
under the provisions of this section.
(2) A local[No district] board of education shall not levy a general tax rate within the
limits imposed in subsection (1) of this section which respectively exceeds the
compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010, except as provided in
subsections (9) and (10) of this section, KRS 157.440, and KRS 157.621, until the
local[district] board of education has complied with the provisions of subsection (7)
of this section.
(3) Upon receipt of property assessments from the Department of Revenue, the
commissioner of education shall certify the following to each local[district] board
of education:
(a) The general tax rate that a local[district] board of education could levy under
the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, and the amount of revenue
expected to be produced;
(b) The compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010 for a district's general
tax rate the amount of revenue expected to be produced;
(c) The general tax rate which will produce, respectively, no more revenue from
real property, exclusive of revenue from new property, than four percent (4%)
over the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate as defined
in KRS 132.010, and the amount of revenue expected to be produced.
(4) Upon completion of action on property assessment data, the Department of
Revenue shall submit certified property assessment data as required in KRS
133.125 to the chief state school officer.
(5) Within thirty (30) days after the local[district] board of education has received its
assessment data, the rates levied shall be forwarded to the Kentucky Board of
Education for its approval or disapproval. The failure of the local[district] board of
education to furnish the rates within the time prescribed shall not invalidate any
Page 22 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
levy made thereafter.
(6) (a) Each local[district] board of education shall, on or before January 31 of each
calendar year, formally and publicly examine detailed line item estimated
revenues and proposed expenditures for the subsequent fiscal year. On or
before May 30 of each calendar year, each local[district] board of education
shall adopt a tentative working budget which shall include a minimum reserve
of two percent (2%) of the total budget.
(b) Each local[district] board of education shall submit to the Kentucky Board of
Education no later than September 30, a close estimate or working budget
which shall conform to the administrative regulations prescribed by the
Kentucky Board of Education.
(7) (a) Except as provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this section and KRS
157.440, a local[district] board of education proposing to levy a general tax
rate within the limits of subsection (1) of this section which exceed the
compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010 shall hold a public hearing
to hear comments from the public regarding the proposed tax rate. The
hearing shall be held in the principal office of the taxing district or, in the
event the taxing district does not have an[has no] office[,] or the office is not
suitable for the[such a] hearing, the hearing shall be held in a suitable facility
as near as possible to the geographic center of the district.
(b) The local[district] board of education shall advertise the hearing by causing
the following to be published at least twice for two (2) consecutive weeks, in
the newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type
advertisement of not less than twelve (12) column inches:
1. The general tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue
produced by that rate;
2. The general tax rate for the current year, and the revenue expected to be
Page 23 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
produced by that rate;
3. The compensating general tax rate, and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days nor more than ten (10) days after the day that the second
advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained herein.
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property, addressed to the property owner at his or her residence or principal
place of business as shown on the current year property tax roll.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The local[district] board of
education may set reasonable time limits for testimony.
(8) (a) [That portion of ]A general tax rate, except as provided in subsections (9) and
(10) of this section, KRS 157.440, and KRS 157.621, levied by an action of a
local[district] board of education which will produce, respectively, revenue
from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property, more than four
percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax
rate as defined in KRS 132.010, shall be subject to a recall vote or
reconsideration by the local[district] board of education as provided for in
KRS 132.017, and shall be advertised as provided for in paragraph (b) of this
subsection.
Page 24 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
(b) The local[district] board of education shall, within seven (7) days following
the adoption of its[an] ordinance, order, resolution, or motion to levy a
general tax rate, except as provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this section
and KRS 157.440, which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive
of revenue from new property as defined in KRS 132.010, more than four
percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax
rate as defined in KRS 132.010, cause the following to be published, in the
newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of
not less than twelve (12) column inches:
1. The fact that the local[district] board of education has adopted the[such
a] rate; and
2. The fact that[ the part of] the rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property as defined in KRS 132.010, in
excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010 is subject to recall[;
and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the
county or urban-county in which the school district is located, with a
notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate].
(9) (a) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, effective for school
years beginning after June 30, 1990, the local board of education of each
school district shall levy a minimum equivalent tax rate of thirty cents ($0.30)
for general school purposes. "Equivalent tax rate" is defined as the rate which
results when the income collected during the prior year from all taxes levied
by the district for school purposes is divided by the total assessed value of
property plus the assessment for motor vehicles certified by the Department of
Page 25 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 128
Revenue. School districts collecting school taxes authorized by KRS 160.593
to 160.597, 160.601 to 160.633, or 160.635 to 160.648 for less than twelve
(12) months during a school year shall have included in income collected
under this section the pro rata tax collection for twelve (12) months.
(b) Failure of a board to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection may
constitute a forfeiture of office by its members pursuant to KRS 415.050 and
415.060.
(10) Except as required under subsection (5)(b) of Section 1 of this Act, a
local[district] board of education may levy a general tax rate that will produce
revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property, that is four
percent (4%) over the amount of the revenue produced by the compensating tax rate
as defined in KRS 132.010.
Section 8. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Page 26 of 26
BR012800.100 - 128 - XXXX 3/9/2026 3:24 PM Jacketed